Hawaii statutes.
§466-11.5 Single act evidence of practice.
In any action brought under this chapter, evidence of the commission of a
single act prohibited by this chapter shall be sufficient to justify a penalty,
injunction, restraining order, or conviction, respectively, without evidence of
a general course of conduct. [L 1989, c 110, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 34, §31]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next